Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 175.46, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Construction trades programs. new text end new text begin The commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) approve youth skills training programs in the construction trades, if the program is restricted to work at a central location such as a headquarters site or training facility; and new text end new text begin (2) exempt students in programs under this subdivision from any conflicting child labor laws, as allowed under section 181A.07, subdivision 7. new text end